Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1490.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 8.10. Certified Registered Nurse Practitioner Pilot Program. -- (a) The board shall establish the Certified Registered Nurse Practitioner Pilot Program to allow an eligible certified registered nurse practitioner to receive an additional certification to practice as an independent practitioner in a health professional shortage area.(b) A certified registered nurse practitioner shall be 1234567891011121314151617181920 eligible to participate in the program if the certified registered nurse practitioner meets all of the following criteria:(1) The certified registered nurse practitioner holds a current license to practice in this Commonwealth.(2) The certified registered nurse practitioner received no disciplinary action or has no pending disciplinary action within the five (5) years immediately preceding the date of the certified registered nurse practitioner's application under paragraph (4).(3) The certified registered nurse practitioner engaged in the practice of professional nursing in collaboration with a physician for a period of not less than three (3) years and not less than three thousand six hundred (3,600) hours in accordance with a collaborative or written agreement with a physician and the practice occurred in a primary care setting within the five (5) years immediately preceding the date of the certified registered nurse practitioner's application under paragraph (4).(4) The certified registered nurse practitioner submits an application with the board on a form prescribed by the board and pays a fee established by the board. The application shall attest that the certified registered nurse practitioner meets the criteria to participate in the program under paragraph (3) and shall be signed by a current or former collaborating physician under paragraph (3). If the certified registered nurse practitioner is unable to obtain the signature required under this paragraph, the board may accept any other documentation attesting that the certified registered nurse practitioner meets the criteria to participate in the program under paragraph (3).(c) While practicing in a health professional shortage area 20250HB1490PN1744 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under the program, a certified registered nurse practitioner may:(1) practice in accordance with section 8.2 without a collaborative agreement; and(2) prescribe medical therapeutic or corrective measures in accordance with section 8.3 without a collaborative agreement.(d) In order to continue to participate in the program, a certified registered nurse practitioner shall be subject to biennial renewal and shall submit a renewal application on a form prescribed by the board, pay a fee established by the board and complete ten (10) hours of continuing education approved by the board in patient safety and risk management. The renewal application under this subsection shall attest that the certified registered nurse practitioner completed the continuing education required under this subsection. The continuing education required under this subsection shall be in addition to the continuing education required under section 8.1(c).(e) While practicing in a health professional shortage area under the program, the clinical practice of a certified registered nurse practitioner shall be limited to primary care, including family practice, internal medicine, gynecology or pediatrics. A certified registered nurse practitioner shall immediately notify the board in writing if the certified registered nurse practitioner changes practice settings or provides care in an area that is not a health professional shortage area. A certified registered nurse practitioner who fails to provide the notice required under this subsection or who is found to be practicing outside of the practice settings or health professional shortage area specified in the notice shall not be authorized to continue participation in the program 20250HB1490PN1744 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and disciplinary actions may be taken on the certified registered nurse practitioner's license as deemed necessary by the board.(f) While participating in the program in a health professional shortage area, a certified registered nurse practitioner shall be accountable to the board, nursing profession and patients and shall have the following duties:(1) The certified registered nurse practitioner shall comply with the requirements of this act and the standard of care of advanced nursing care rendered.(2) The certified registered nurse practitioner shall recognize the certified registered nurse practitioner's limitation regarding knowledge and experience.(3) The certified registered nurse practitioner shall wear a name identification badge stating the individual's profess ional title and shall inform new patients in writing about the certified registered nurse practitioner's qualifications , including a disclosure that the certified registered nurse practitioner is not a physician, and the nature of the certified registered nurse practitioner's autonomous practice before or during the initial patient encounter.(4) The certified registered nurse practitioner shall plan for the management of situations beyond the certified registered nurse practitioner's expertise.(5) The certified registered nurse practitioner shall consult with and refer patients to other health care providers, as appropriate.(g) (1) The board shall be responsible for administering the program. Within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this subsection, the board shall establish a subcommittee to 20250HB1490PN1744 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assist the board in administering the program. The subcommittee shall consist of the following members:(i) The Secretary of Health or a designee from the Department of Health, Bureau of Health Planning, that has experience and expertise in health professional shortage areas , who shall serve as chair of the subcommittee . (ii) Two certified registered nurse practitioners who are actively engaged in primary care clinical practice. The certified registered nurse practitioners shall be selected by a Statewide professional organization representing certified registered nurse practitioners engaged in primary care clinical practice. The Statewide professional organization shall submit the names of the certified registered nurse practitioners selected under this subparagraph to the board for appointment on the subcommittee.(iii) Two licensed physicians, one of whom shall be an allopathic physician and one of whom shall be an osteopathic physician, who are actively engaged in primary care clinical practice. The licensed physicians shall be selected by Statewide professional organizations representing family medicine, internal medicine or pediatrics. The Statewide professional organizations shall submit the names of the licensed physicians selected under this subparagraph to the board for appointment on the subcommittee. At the time of appointment under this subparagraph, the licensed physicians shall meet all of the following criteria:(A) The licensed physicians shall be collaborating with a certified registered nurse practitioner or shall have collaborated with a certified registered nurse practitioner within the preceding three (3) years.20250HB1490PN1744 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) The licensed physicians shall be nationally board certified in family medicine, internal medicine or pediatrics.(2) The subcommittee shall have the following duties:(i) Provide guidance to certified registered nurse practitioners regarding the qualifications to participate in the program.(ii) Approve the temporary regulations promulgated under subsection (m).(iii) Review applications for certification to participate in the program.(iv) Collaborate with the board to approve, issue, track and revoke the certification of certified registered nurse practitioners to participate in the program.(v) Conduct a preliminary review of a certified registered nurse practitioner's application to participate in the program. If the subcommittee determines that the certified registered nurse practitioner meets the criteria to participate in the program under subsection (b), the subcommittee shall submit a notice of preapproval to the board. The board may not issue a certification to participate in the program to a certified registered nurse practitioner if the certified registered nurse practitioner's application has not been preapproved by the subcommittee under this subparagraph.(h) While participating in the program in a health professional shortage area, a certified registered nurse practitioner shall be recognized as a primary care provider.(i) A certified registered nurse practitioner who participates in the program shall be deemed to be a participating health care provider as defined in section 702 of the act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical 20250HB1490PN1744 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act, shall meet the requirements under section 711 of t he Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act, and shall be assessed under section 712 of the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act. Upon receiving an assessment under section 712 of the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act, the certified registered nurse practitioner who participates in the program shall be eligible to receive money from claims paid by the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error Fund. For purposes of the program, the board shall be considered a licensure authority as defined in section 702 of the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act.(j) If a certified registered nurse practitioner intends to practice simultaneously under the program, and pursuant to a collaboration agreement with a physician who is external to the program, the collaborating physician shall have no legal responsibility for acts or omissions of the certified registered nurse practitioner practicing under the program.(k) (1) Five (5) years after the effective date of this subsection, the Joint State Government Commission shall conduct a study on the program and, within six (6) months of commencing the study, submit the study to the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate and the Professional Licensure Committee of the House of Representatives for the purpose of evaluating the program. The study shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:(i) The number of certified registered nurse practitioners who participated in the program and the health professional 20250HB1490PN1744 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shortage areas where they participated.(ii) The number of certified registered nurse practitioners who were rejected from participating in the program and the reason why they were rejected.(iii) The number of certified registered nurse practitioners that left the program and the reason why they left the program.(iv) The access to patient care, patient outcomes and emergency room use in the health professional shortage areas covered under the program as compared to the access to patient care, patient outcomes and emergency room use in the areas not covered by the program.(v) The number of referrals by certified registered nurse practitioners to emergency hospitals, the severity of illness experienced by each referred patient and the number of repeat visits by patients to emergency hospitals.(vi) A comparison of the use of advanced diagnostic tests and imaging by certified registered nurse practitioners participating in the program and the use of advanced diagnostic tests and imaging by primary care physicians in the same health professional shortage area.(vii) The number of complaints filed with the board, the nature of the complaints and the disciplinary actions that were taken.(viii) The number of referrals by certified registered nurse practitioners to physician specialists as compared to primary care physicians in the same health professional shortage areas covered under the program, including the types of specialists referred to by certified registered nurse practitioners, the reasons for the referrals and the number of visits with each certified registered nurse practitioner before the referrals.20250HB1490PN1744 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ix) The number of certified registered nurse practitioners that are employed while participating in the program versus the number of certified registered nurse practitioners that are working in private practice under the program.(x) Any other relevant information to evaluate the program.(2) The Joint State Government Commission shall obtain deidentified data from health insurance company claims on patients receiving care from a certified registered nurse practitioner participating in the program for the purpose of collecting data to complete the study under paragraph (1).(3) The board shall provide the Joint State Government Commission, upon request, with all information necessary to complete the study under paragraph (1).(l) The department shall notify the board and subcommittee immediately upon receiving notification of an alleged violation of this section. The board shall maintain current records of all reports of alleged violations and periodically review the records for the purpose of determining that each alleged violation has been resolved in a timely manner, and if necessary, forward the reports to the State Board of Medicine or the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine for informational purposes.(m) The board shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement the program as approved by the subcommittee established under subsection (g)(1) and with the consideration of any recommendations made by the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate and the Professional Licensure Committee of the House of Representatives for the purpose of evaluating the program. In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of the program, regulations 20250HB1490PN1744 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 promulgated by the board shall be deemed temporary regulations which shall not expire for a period of six (6) years following publication. Temporary regulations promulgated under this subsection shall not be subject to:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(3) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(n) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) permit a certified registered nurse practitioner to practice under the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, or the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act; or(2) prohibit a certified registered nurse practitioner certified under the program from consulting with or seeking information related to patient care from a physician. For the purpose of this section, no physician-patient relationship shall be established between a patient and a physician with whom the certified registered nurse practitioner consults or from whom clinical information or guidance is sought.(o) The program shall expire six (6) years after the effective date of this subsection. Upon the expiration of the program, the following shall apply:(1) A certified registered nurse practitioner shall be 20250HB1490PN1744 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deemed to have retired as a health care practitioner for the purposes of the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act.(2) A certified registered nurse practitioner may not practice under the program.(p) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Health professional shortage area" shall mean a geographic or population area in this Commonwealth designated by the United States Department of Health and Human Services that indicates a health care professional shortage in primary care."Program" shall mean the Certified Registered Nurse Pilot Program established under subsection (a).Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 8.10(g) and (m) of the act shall take effect immediately.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1490PN1744 - 11 - 12345678910111213141516171819